Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-1215
Special assessment district; ordinance; file copy with register of deeds.

Whenever a municipality has enacted an ordinance creating a special assessment district, it shall be the duty of such municipality to file a copy of such ordinance in the office of the register of deeds of the county in which such municipality is located.

Laws 1973, LB 373, § 2;

Laws 2021, LB163, § 82.